Utah, session 2026, HB549.
Section 1. Section 54-7-13.7 is enacted to read:54-7-13.7. Energy rebate program -- Requirement -- Reporting to Office of Energy Development.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Energy rebate program" means a program operated by a large-scale public utility that provides financial rebates or incentives to customers for measures that reduce energy consumption or improve the efficiency of energy consumption.(b)"Large-scale public utility" means a public utility that:(i)provides retail electric service to more than 200,000 retail customers in the state; or(ii)provides retail natural gas service to more than 200,000 retail customers in the state.(c)"Office" means the Office of Energy Development created in Section 79-6-401.(2)On or before September 1, 2026, and annually thereafter on or before September 1, a large-scale public utility that operates an energy rebate program shall submit a report to the office describing the energy rebate program operated by the large-scale public utility during the previous calendar year.(3)The report required by Subsection (2) shall include:(a)a description of each energy rebate program offered by the large-scale public utility;(b)for each energy rebate program:(i)the types of rebates and incentives offered, including financial amounts and eligibility criteria;(ii)customer participation during the program year, including the number of participants in each of the following customer categories:(A)residential customers;(B)commercial customers;(C)industrial customers;(D)irrigation customers; and(E)any other customer class as determined by the large-scale public utility;(iii)the total amount of rebates and incentives issued;(iv)energy savings achieved through the program;(v)cost-effectiveness metrics for the program; and(vi)administrative costs incurred; and(c)how each energy rebate program aligns with the state energy policy described in Section 79-6-301.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 79-6-405 is amended to read:79-6-405. Reports -- Study.(1)The director shall report annually to the Public Utilities, Energy, and Technology Interim Committee.(2)The report required in Subsection (1) shall:(a)summarize the status and development of the state's energy resources;(b)summarize the activities and accomplishments of the office;(c)address the director's activities under this part; (d)recommend any energy-related executive or legislative action the director or office considers beneficial to the state, including updates to the state energy policy under Section 79-6-301; and(e)address long-term energy planning required under Subsection 79-6-401(10).(3)(a)The office shall study the impacts of the following on energy costs in the state:(i)Title 59, Chapter 33, Wind or Solar Electric Generation Facility Capacity Tax; and(ii)Part 1114, Energy Project Assessment.(b)The director shall report the office's findings regarding the study required under this Subsection (3) to the Public Utilities, Energy, and Technology Interim Committee by no later than the 2026 November interim meeting of the Public Utilities, Energy, and Technology Interim Committee.(4)(a)On or before November 1, 2026, and annually thereafter on or before November 1, the office shall:(i)review the reports submitted by large-scale public utilities under Section 54-7-13.7;(ii)consult with each large-scale public utility that submitted a report under Section 54-7-13.7 regarding the alignment of the large-scale public utility's energy rebate program with the state energy policy described in Section 79-6-301; and(iii)as part of the consultation described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii), provide recommendations to each large-scale public utility for improving the alignment of the energy rebate program with the state energy policy.(b)The director shall include in the annual report required by Subsection (1) a summary of:(i)the energy rebate programs operated by large-scale public utilities in the state during the previous calendar year;(ii)the office's findings regarding the alignment of those programs with the state energy policy; and(iii)any recommendations made to large-scale public utilities under Subsection (4)(a)(iii).

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.